Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) The authority shall provide coverage under this chapter for all federal food and drug administration approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization or step therapy. This coverage must be provided to apple health clients enrolled in both fee-for-service and managed care programs.(2) Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed health care system shall provide coverage without prior authorization or step therapy for all federal food and drug administration approved HIV antiviral drugs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---